Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4055
Nonresident license; requirements; revocation; grounds; hearing.

(1) Unless denied licensure pursuant to section 44-4059, a nonresident person shall receive a nonresident insurance producer license if:

(a) The person is currently licensed as a resident and in good standing in his or her home state;

(b) The person has submitted the proper request for licensure and has paid the fees required by section 44-4064;

(c) The person has submitted or transmitted to the director the application for licensure that the person submitted to his or her home state, or in lieu of the same, a completed uniform application; and

(d) The person's home state awards nonresident producer licenses to residents of this state on the same basis.

(2) The director may verify the insurance producer's licensing status through the producer database maintained by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates or subsidiaries, or any successor, or by contacting the person's home state regulator.

(3) A nonresident insurance producer who moves from one state to another state or a resident producer who moves from this state to another state shall file a change of address and provide certification from the new resident state within thirty days of the change of legal residence. No fee or license application is required for the filing of the change of address.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Insurance Producers Licensing Act, a person licensed as a surplus lines insurance producer in his or her home state shall receive a nonresident surplus lines producer license pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Except as to subsection (1) of this section, nothing in this section otherwise amends or supersedes any provision of the Surplus Lines Insurance Act.

(5) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Insurance Producers Licensing Act, a person licensed as a limited line credit insurance producer, a limited line pre-need funeral insurance producer, or other type of limited lines producer in his or her home state shall receive a nonresident limited lines insurance producer license, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, granting the same scope of authority as granted under the license issued by the producer's home state.

(6) If a nonresident licensee's license or authority in the licensee's home state is no longer active, whether as a result of suspension, revocation, termination, lapse, voluntary surrender, or other action by the home state regulator, the director may cancel the nonresident licensee's license or authority granted in this state by sending an order of license revocation to the licensee. The licensee may make written demand upon the director within thirty days after receiving such order of license revocation for a hearing before the director to provide proof the licensee is currently licensed as a resident and in good standing in his or her home state. Such hearing shall be held within thirty days after the date a request for hearing is received and shall be held pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act. If no hearing is requested within thirty days after receipt of an order of license revocation, the order of license revocation shall become a final order.

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 9;

Laws 2015, LB198, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB967, § 4.
July 18, 2026
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

Surplus Lines Insurance Act, see section 44-5501.